Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1015
Assistance; investigation; attendance of witnesses; production of records; subpoena power; oaths.

For the purpose of any investigation or hearing, the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services and the division directors appointed pursuant to section 81-3115, through authorized agents, shall have the power to compel, by subpoena, the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books and papers. Witnesses may be examined on oath or affirmation.

Laws 1965, c. 394, § 3, p. 1262;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 40;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 312;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 269.